Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.220.020

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1878-S.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Appropriate course delivery standards" means the classroom and behind-the-wheel student learning experiences considered acceptable to the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.220.030 that must be satisfactorily accomplished by the student in order to successfully complete the driver training education course.

(2) "Approved private school" means a private school approved by the board of education under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(4) "Driver training education course" means a course of instruction in traffic safety education (a) offered as part of a traffic safety education program authorized by the superintendent of public instruction and certified by the department of licensing and (b) taught by a qualified teacher of driver training education that consists of classroom and behind-the-wheel instruction using curriculum that meets joint superintendent of public instruction and department of licensing standards and the course requirements established by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.220.030. Behind-the-wheel instruction is characterized by driving experience.

(5) "Qualified teacher of driver training education" means an instructor who:

(a) Is certificated under chapter 28A.410 RCW and has obtained a traffic safety endorsement or a letter of approval to teach traffic safety education from the superintendent of public instruction or is certificated by the superintendent of public instruction to teach a driver training education course; or

(b) Is an instructor provided by a driver training school that has contracted with a school district's or districts' board of directors under RCW 28A.220.030(3) to teach driver education for the school district.

(6) "Superintendent" or "state superintendent" means the superintendent of public instruction.

(7) "Traffic safety education program" means the administration and provision of driver training education courses offered by secondary schools of a school district or vocational-technical schools that are conducted by such schools in a like manner to their other regular courses.

[ 2017 c 197 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 218; 1979 c 158 s 195; 1977 c 76 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 1; 1963 c 39 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.08.010, 46.81.010.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Findings—Intent—2017 c 197: "The legislature finds that there is a need to establish consistency in the quality of driver training education in this state to reduce the number of young driver accidents that are prematurely killing our youth. The traffic safety commission reports that out of two hundred forty-five fatalities in the first half of 2016, thirty-one involved young drivers aged sixteen to twenty-five. The intent of this act is to require driver training education curriculum to be developed and maintained jointly by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of licensing. The legislature also finds that there is a need to audit driver training education courses; therefore, the intent of this act is also to provide the department of licensing with resources and authority to audit all driver training education courses, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction for driver training education courses offered by school districts." [ 2017 c 197 s 1.]

Effective date—2017 c 197: "Except for section 13 of this act, this act takes effect August 1, 2018." [ 2017 c 197 s 16.]

Severability—1977 c 76: See note following RCW 28A.220.010.